California statutes. Public Utilities Code
For a water or sewer system corporation or an entity merging with or acquiring control of a water or sewer system corporation with less than 2,000 service connections, the following shall apply to transactions valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, notwithstanding Sections 851 and 854:

(a) (1) A water or sewer system corporation or an entity merging with or acquiring control of a water or sewer system corporation shall receive the commission’s approval before entering into a transaction that would otherwise be subject to Section 851 or 854.

(2) If a water or sewer system corporation or an entity merging with or acquiring
 control of a water or sewer system corporation fails to receive the commission’s approval pursuant to paragraph (1), the transaction is voidable by the commission until the commission does either of the following:

(A) Retroactively approves the transaction upon a determination that the transaction is in the best interests of both the corporation and its ratepayers.

(B) Conditionally approves the transaction, subject to the fulfillment of specified conditions that would ensure that the transaction is in the best interests of both the corporation and its ratepayers.

(b) The commission may delegate the authority to make the determinations described in subdivision (a) to the director of the division that investigates water and sewer system service quality issues and analyzes and processes utility rate change
 requests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.   (SB 1112)   Effective September 25, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

(a) A person or corporation, whether or not organized under the laws of this state, shall not directly or indirectly merge, acquire, or control, including pursuant to a change in control as described in subparagraphs (D) or (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 854.2, any public utility organized and doing business in this state without first securing authorization to do so from the commission. The commission may establish, by order or rule, the definitions of what constitutes a merger, acquisition, or control activity that is subject to this section. Any merger, acquisition, or control without that prior authorization is void. A public utility organized and doing business under the laws of this state, and a subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, a public utility, shall not aid or
 abet any violation of this section.

(b) Before authorizing the merger, acquisition, or control of any electrical, gas, or telephone corporation organized and doing business in this state, if any utility that is a party to the proposed transaction has gross annual California revenues exceeding five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), the commission shall find that the proposal does all of the following:

(1) Provide short-term and long-term economic benefits to ratepayers.

(2) Equitably allocate, where the commission has ratemaking authority, the total short-term and long-term forecasted economic benefits, as determined by the commission, of the proposed merger, acquisition, or control, between shareholders and ratepayers. Ratepayers shall receive not less than 50 percent of those benefits.

(3) Not adversely affect competition. In making this finding, the commission shall request an advisory opinion from the Attorney General regarding whether competition will be adversely affected and what mitigation measures could be adopted to avoid this result.

(4) For an electrical or gas corporation, ensure the corporation will have an adequate workforce to maintain the safe and reliable operation of the utility assets.

(c) Before authorizing the merger, acquisition, or control of any electrical, gas, or telephone corporation organized and doing business in this state, if any entity that is a party to the proposed transaction has gross annual California revenues exceeding five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), the commission shall consider each of the criteria listed in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and
 find, on balance, that the merger, acquisition, or control proposal is in the public interest.

(1) Maintain or improve the financial condition of the resulting public utility doing business in the state.

(2) Maintain or improve the quality of service to public utility ratepayers in the state.

(3) Maintain or improve the quality of management of the resulting public utility doing business in the state.

(4) Be fair and reasonable to affected public utility employees, including both union and nonunion employees.

(5) Be fair and reasonable to the majority of all affected public utility shareholders.

(6) Be beneficial on an
 overall basis to state and local economies and to the communities in the area served by the resulting public utility.

(7) Preserve the jurisdiction of the commission and the capacity of the commission to effectively regulate and audit public utility operations in the state.

(8) Provide mitigation measures to prevent significant adverse consequences that may result.

(d) (1) Before authorizing the merger, acquisition, or change in control of any electrical or gas corporation organized and doing business in this state, if any entity that is a party to the proposed transaction has gross annual California revenues exceeding four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000), the commission shall consider the elements in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, and find, on balance, that the proposal is in the
 public interest.

(A) A safety management system.

(B) A comprehensive safety plan that includes a systemwide strategic approach for the safety of both employees and the public.

(C) Plans to maintain or improve the records of the electrical corporation’s electric plant or gas corporation’s gas plant, including necessary audits to update incorrect or incomplete records of the electrical or gas corporation. For purposes of this subparagraph, “records” shall include, but not be limited to, locations, depth, age, maintenance and testing history, maps, surveys, patrols, and violation history of the electrical corporation’s electric plant or gas corporation’s gas plant.

(D) Metrics to measure safety that are complete and drive appropriate behavior.

(E) An appropriate evaluation of safety expertise in the list of qualifications used in selecting corporate leadership.

(F) Active audits for safety controls.

(G) A nonpunitive system for reporting potential safety incidents to the commission to facilitate the identification of accident precursors by persons familiar with the operations of the electrical or gas corporation, including, but not limited to, employees and contractors of the electrical or gas corporation, and the collection, analysis, and dissemination of unbiased safety information. An employee of, or the employee of a contractor performing work for, the electrical or gas corporation shall not be subject to demotion, discharge, or any other form of retaliation or discrimination for participating in the potential safety incident reporting system established
 pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The commission may delay the implementation of this subdivision until July 1, 2021, or until the commission adopts rules implementing the requirements of this subdivision, whichever is earlier.

(e) When reviewing a merger, acquisition, or control proposal, the commission shall consider reasonable options to the proposal recommended by other parties, including no new merger, acquisition, or control, to determine whether comparable short-term and long-term economic savings can be achieved through other means while avoiding the possible adverse consequences of the proposal.

(f) The person or corporation seeking acquisition or control of a public utility organized and doing business in this state shall have, before the commission, the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence
 that the requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) are met.

(g) In determining whether an acquiring utility has gross annual revenues exceeding the amount specified in subdivisions (b) and (c), the revenues of an affiliate of that utility shall not be considered unless the affiliate was used to effect the merger, acquisition, or control.

(h) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) do not apply to the formation of a holding company.

(i) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), the Legislature does not intend to include acquisitions or changes in control that are mandated by either the commission or the Legislature as a result of, or in response to, any electric industry restructuring. However, the value of an acquisition or change in control may be used by the commission in determining the
 costs or benefits attributable to any electric industry restructuring and for allocating those costs or benefits for collection in rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

854.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California’s electric and gas utilities provide essential services to California residents and businesses, which are necessary to maintaining the vitality of California’s economy.

(2) Consistent with Sections 913.4, 961, and 977, an adequately sized workforce of experienced electric and gas utility employees with the appropriate training and skills, as well as the knowledge of an electric or gas utility’s facilities and equipment, is essential to the safe, efficient, and uninterrupted provision of electrical and gas services. Safe and reliable electric and gas utility service is vital to public health, public safety, air quality, and
 reducing emissions of greenhouse gases.

(3) Changes in the ownership or control of an electrical corporation or gas corporation may create uncertainty regarding the safe, efficient, and continuous provision of safe and reliable electrical and gas service to California consumers, leading to economic instability.

(4) Mass displacement of electrical corporation or gas corporation workers as a result of a change in the ownership or control of an electrical corporation or gas corporation causes excessive reliance on the unemployment insurance system, and public social services and health programs, increasing costs to these vital governmental programs and placing a significant burden on the state and California taxpayers.

(5) The state has a compelling interest in ensuring that when there is a change in the ownership or
 control of an electrical corporation or gas corporation, the new employer maintains a qualified and knowledgeable workforce with the ability to ensure safe, efficient, reliable, and continuous service to California consumers and communities.

(6) Because of destructive and deadly wildfires and gas pipeline explosions, the electric and gas industries are in an unprecedented state of instability. One combined electrical and gas corporation has sought bankruptcy protection. All the major electrical corporations have had their credit ratings lowered to junk bond status or are at risk of downgrades to junk bond status. This jeopardizes the ability of these corporations to provide safe and reliable electric and gas service, to reduce the risk of future catastrophes, to provide service at just and reasonable rates, to meet the state’s mandates to reduce carbon emissions, and to address the risks of climate change.

(7) There is a nationwide shortage of the qualified utility line workers and qualified line clearance tree trimmers needed to prevent and respond to wildfires, storms, and other major events. Because this work is performed on and near high voltage lines and other energized electrical equipment, these jobs require substantial training and are highly dangerous. Current efforts to hire enough qualified people to perform these functions have fallen short even though exceptional compensation packages are being offered. Any reduction in the number or qualifications of these employees would increase the risk to employees and the risk of future catastrophic wildfires, and would increase the frequency and duration of outages, particularly as a result of more common and more severe major storms. It is in the interest of the state and its citizens that utilities have the qualified workforce necessary to minimize the risk of future wildfires, to minimize
 future outages, and to restore service as promptly as possible after storms.

(8) For the reasons provided in this subdivision, the Legislature must take action to stabilize the utility workforce so as to preserve the ability of utilities to provide safe and reliable electric and gas service. This requires that the size of the workforce be preserved or increased, and workers not be lost to other utilities offering more stable employment or better compensation.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Change of control” means any of the following:

(A) An event that triggers the application of Section 851 or 854.

(B) A material change in ownership of the
 electric corporation or gas corporation, its parent company, or its holding company.

(C) A filing seeking bankruptcy protection.

(D) The sale of all or a material portion of the assets of the electrical corporation or gas corporation, its parent company, or its holding company, or any merger, consolidation, or acquisition of the electrical corporation or gas corporation, its parent company, or its holding company with, by, or into another corporation, entity, or person.

(E) In the case of a combined electrical and gas corporation, the change in ownership of all or a substantial portion of either the gas or electric line of business of the combined corporation.

(F) A voluntary or involuntary change in ownership of assets from an electrical or gas
 corporation to ownership by a public entity.

(2) (A) “Covered employee” means an individual who has been employed by an electrical corporation or gas corporation for at least 90 days immediately before a change of control affecting that individual’s principal place of employment. A change of control affects a covered employee’s principal place of employment where the change of control results in the predecessor employer transferring control of the place of employment to the successor employer.

(B) “Covered employee” does not include any of the following:

(i) A managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee.

(ii) A temporary employee.

(iii) A part-time employee who
 has worked less than 20 hours per week for the predecessor employer for at least 90 days immediately before the change of control.

(3) “Person” means a corporation as defined in Section 204, a person as defined in Section 205, any other individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign.

(4) “Predecessor employer” means the person who controls the electric or gas utility before the change of control.

(5) “Principal place of employment” of an employee means the office or other facility of the electrical corporation or gas corporation where the employee is principally assigned to work by the predecessor
 employer.

(6) “Successor employer” means the person who controls the electrical corporation or gas corporation after the change of control.

(7) “Total compensation” means the combined value of the covered employee’s wages and benefits immediately before the change of control. Total compensation may be paid entirely as wages or in any combination of wages and fringe benefits, to be determined by the successor employer. Total compensation includes, but is not necessarily limited to, both of the following amounts:

(A) The covered employee’s hourly wage rate or the per diem value of the covered employee’s monthly salary.

(B) Employer payments toward the covered employee’s health and welfare and pension benefits. Employer payments toward health and welfare
 and pension benefits shall include only those payments that are recognized as employer payments under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code.

(8) “Transition period” means a period of 180 days immediately following the effective date of a change of control.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a successor employer shall retain all covered employees for at least the transition period following a change of control, unless the commission approves a reduction in the workforce pursuant to subdivision (i). During the transition period, the successor employer shall not reduce the total compensation of a covered employee.

(2) During the transition period, a successor employer shall not terminate a covered employee without cause.

(d) (1) No later than 15 days before the effective date of a change of control, the predecessor employer shall do both of the following:

(A) Cause to be posted, in a conspicuous place in a manner that is readily viewed by covered employees, a public notice of the change of control at each principal place of employment of any covered employee.

(B) Cause the notice to be sent to any labor organization that represents covered employees.

(2) The notice shall include the name of the predecessor employer and its contact information, the name of the successor employer and its contact information, and the effective date of the change of control. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place in a manner that is readily viewed by covered
 employees.

(e) This part shall not be construed to limit the right of covered employees to bring legal action for wrongful termination.

(f) The rights and remedies provided pursuant to this section are in addition to, and are not intended to supplant, any existing rights or remedies.

(g) No later than 15 days before the effective date of a change of control, a predecessor employer shall provide to the successor employer the name, address, date of hire, total compensation, and classification of each covered employee.

(h) A successor employer shall retain the following written or electronic records for at least three years:

(1) The list provided to the successor employer pursuant to
 subdivision (g).

(2) Any offer of employment made to a covered employee.

(3) Any termination of a covered employee during a transition period, including the reasons for the termination.

(4) Any written evaluation of a covered employee.

(i) For three years after the transition period and subject to the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement, a successor employer shall provide to employees who would have qualified as covered employees had they been employed during the 90-day period immediately before a change of control no less than the wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment provided before the change of control, including any previously negotiated increase in wages, and shall maintain no less than the total number
 of employees who would have qualified as covered employees had they been employed during the 90-day period immediately before a change of control. The successor employer may reduce the wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment or the total number of employees in a manner inconsistent with collective bargaining agreements only if authorized by the commission in a final, nonappealable decision. The commission shall not provide this authorization except on proof by a preponderance of the evidence in an application proceeding of all of the following:

(1) Neither the nature nor scope of the work performed by those employees proposed to be eliminated is necessary to providing safe and reliable utility service. The electrical corporation or gas corporation shall provide an independent third-party study to support its position. Other parties to the proceeding shall be provided with an opportunity to conduct their own studies.

(2) The proposed new wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment shall be consistent with wages, hours, and other terms for California electrical corporations and gas corporations. The electrical corporation or gas corporation shall provide an independent third-party study to support its position. Other parties to the proceeding shall be provided an opportunity to conduct their own studies.

(3) There will be no reduction in the ability of employees of the electrical or gas corporation to prevent damage from or to respond to an emergency such as a wildfire, storm, flood, mudslide, or earthquake, or to gas leaks, electric outages, interconnection requests, work requested by others, locate and mark requests, or other utility services.

(4) There will be no reduction in the ability of the electrical
 corporation or gas corporation to respond to mutual aid requests of other utilities.

(j) A successor employer may terminate an employee with cause consistent with any applicable selective bargaining agreement during the period specified in subdivision (i).

(k) A successor employer and a labor organization representing covered employees may, in a collective bargaining agreement, provide that the agreement supersedes the requirements of this section with respect to the represented employees.

(l) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 31.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

854.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “nonstate entity” means a company, corporation, partnership, firm, or other entity or group of entities, whether organized for profit or not for profit.

(b) The commission, by order, decision, motion, settlement, or other action, shall not establish a nonstate entity with any moneys other than those moneys that would otherwise belong to the public utility’s shareholders. A nonstate entity to be created with moneys from a public utility’s shareholders shall be subject to a 30-day review by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee prior to creation. This subdivision does not limit the authority of the commission to form an advisory committee or
 other body whose budget is subject to oversight by the commission and the Department of Finance.

(c) The commission shall not enter into a contract with a nonstate entity in which a person serves as an owner, director, or officer while serving as a commissioner. Any contract between the commission and a nonstate entity shall be void and cease to exist by operation of law, if a commissioner, who was a commissioner at the time the contract was awarded, entered into, or extended, becomes, on or after January 1, 2014, an owner, director, or officer of the nonstate entity while serving as a commissioner.

(d) Beginning June 1, 2014, a commissioner who acts as an owner, director, or officer of a nonstate entity that was established as a result of an order, decision, motion, settlement,
 or other action by the commission in which the commissioner participated, neglects his or her duty pursuant to Section 1 of Article XII of the California Constitution, and as a result the commissioner may be removed pursuant to that section by the Legislature, two-thirds of the membership of each house concurring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   (SB 434)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

Every officer, agent, or employee of a public utility, or of a subsidiary or affiliate of, or a corporation holding a controlling interest in, a public utility, and every other person subject to the requirements of this article, who violates or fails to comply with, or procures, aids, or abets any violation of, this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

(a) A public utility that owns real property acquired for purposes of obtaining a utility right-of-way, may lease that property to a governmental entity for purposes of a public park, if the utility retains the use of the right-of-way for
 public utility purposes.

(b) In determining whether a lease of real property to a governmental entity for park purposes is for fair value, the commission shall include the community benefits of parks and open space as a benefit to ratepayers.

(c) As used in this section, “community benefits” include, but are not limited to, improving public health, protecting the environment, and increasing recreational assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Controversies Concerning Relocation of Utility Improvements [861. - 861.]

861.

(a) As used in this section, “special law water district” means the Santa Clara Valley Water District and the Yuba-Bear River Basin Authority and, if created by an uncodified special law, any of the following: a county flood control district, a county flood control and water district, a county flood control and water conservation district, a county water conservation and flood control district, or a county water agency.

(b) Whenever by court order or judgment in an eminent domain proceeding or by agreement a special law water district is required to relocate any improvements of a public utility, if the special law water district and the public utility fail to agree as to the character or location of the new improvements to be relocated by the special law water district, the character and location of such new improvements and any other controversy relating thereto shall be submitted to and determined by the Public Utilities Commission in the manner prescribed in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1201).

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Universal Telephone Service [871. - 884.5.]

871.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Moore Universal Telephone Service Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 163, Sec. 2.   Effective July 16, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

871.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The offering of high-quality basic telephone service at affordable rates to the greatest number of citizens has been a longstanding goal of the state.

(b) The Moore Universal Telephone Service Act has been, and continues to be, an important means for achieving universal service by making basic telephone service affordable to low-income households through the creation of a lifeline class of service.

(c) Every
 means should be employed by the commission and telephone corporations to ensure that every household qualified to receive lifeline telephone service is informed of and is afforded the opportunity to subscribe to that service.

(d) The furnishing of lifeline telephone service is in the public interest and should be supported fairly and equitably by every telephone corporation, and the commission, in administering the lifeline telephone service program, should implement the program in a way that is equitable, nondiscriminatory, and without competitive consequences for the telecommunications industry in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 381, Sec. 2.   (AB 2213)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

871.7.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Moore Universal Telephone Service Act, enacted in 1987, was intended to offer high quality basic telephone service at affordable rates to the greatest number of California residents, and has become an important means of achieving universal service by making residential service affordable to low-income citizens through the creation of a lifeline class of service.

(b) Factors such as competition and technological innovation are resulting in the convergence of a variety of telecommunications technologies offering an expanded range of telecommunications services to users that incorporate voice, video, and data. These technologies have differing regulatory regimes and jurisdictions.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission initiate a proceeding investigating the feasibility of redefining universal telephone service by incorporating two-way voice, video, and data service as components of basic service. It is the Legislature’s further intent that, to the extent that the incorporation is feasible, that it promote equity of access to high-speed communications networks, the Internet, and other services to the extent that those services provide social benefits that include all of the following:

(1) Improving the quality of life among the residents of California.

(2) Expanding access to public and private resources for education, training, and commerce.

(3) Increasing access to public resources enhancing public health and safety.

(4) Assisting in bridging the “digital divide” through expanded access to new technologies by low-income, disabled, or otherwise disadvantaged Californians.

(5) Shifting traffic patterns by enabling telecommuting, thereby helping to improve air quality in all areas of the state and mitigating the need for highway expansion.

(d) For purposes of this section, the term “feasibility” means consistency with all of the following:

(1) Technological and competitive neutrality.

(2) Equitable distribution of the funding burden for redefined universal service as described in subdivision (c), among all affected consumers and industries, thereby ensuring that regulated utilities’ ratepayers do not bear a disproportionate share of funding responsibility.

(3) Benefits that justify the costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

873.

(a) The commission shall annually do all of the following:

(1) Designate a class of lifeline service necessary to meet minimum communications needs.

(2) Set the rates and charges for that service.

(3) Develop eligibility criteria for that service.

(4) Assess the degree of achievement of universal service, including telephone penetration rates by income, ethnicity, and geography.

(b) Minimum communications needs include, but are not limited to, the ability to originate and receive calls and the ability to access
 electronic information services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 265.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

874.

The lifeline telephone service rates and charges shall be as follows:

(a) In a residential subscriber’s service area where measured service is not available, the lifeline telephone service rates shall not be more than 50 percent of the rates for basic flat rate service, exclusive of federally mandated end user access charges, available to the residential subscriber.

(b) In a residential subscriber’s service area where measured service is available, the subscriber may elect either of the following:

(1) A lifeline telephone service measured rate of not more than 50 percent of the basic rate for measured service, exclusive of federally mandated end user access charges, available to the residential subscriber.

(2) A lifeline flat rate of not more than 50 percent of the rates for basic flat rate service, exclusive of federally mandated end user access charges, available to the residential subscriber.

(c) The lifeline telephone service installation or connection charge, or both, shall not be more than 50 percent of the charge for basic residential service installation or connection, or both. The commission may limit the number of installation and connection charges, or both, that may be incurred at the reduced rate in any given period.

(d) There shall be no charge to the residential customer who has filed a valid eligibility statement for changing out of lifeline service.

(e) The commission shall assess whether there is a problem with customers who fraudulently obtain lifeline telephone service. If the commission determines that there is a problem, it shall recommend and promulgate appropriate solutions. This assessment and the solutions determined by the commission shall not, in and of themselves, change the procedures developed pursuant to Section 876.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

875.

(a) In addition to Section 874, every lifeline telephone service subscriber shall be given an allowance, reduced by the amount of any credit or allowance authorized by the Federal Communications Commission, equal to the then current or announced federally mandated residential end user access charges.

(b) The commission may, in a separate proceeding, establish procedures necessary to ensure that the lifeline telephone service program qualifies for any federal funds available for the support of those programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

The commission shall require every telephone corporation providing telephone service within a service area to file a schedule of rates and charges providing a class of lifeline telephone service. Every telephone corporation providing service within a service area shall inform all eligible subscribers of the availability of lifeline telephone service, and how they may qualify for and obtain service, and shall accept applications for lifeline telephone service according to procedures specified by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 354, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

876.5.

(a) The commission, its staff, the lifeline program’s third-party administrator, and lifeline service providers, and their contractors, agents, successors, or assignees, shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible any information provided by an applicant or subscriber to the lifeline program, or a subprogram or pilot program of the lifeline program, to any agency of a local government, a state government, or the federal government, or to any immigration authority without a court-ordered subpoena or valid judicial warrant.

(b) This section does not prohibit the furnishing of applications, records, and data to other public agencies to the extent required
 for verifying an applicant’s or subscriber’s eligibility for lifeline service.

(c) This section does not prohibit the commission, its staff, the lifeline program’s third-party administrator, or lifeline service providers from using aggregated subscriber or applicant data for analysis, reporting, or program management if the aggregated subscriber or applicant data cannot be used to determine the identities of the persons to whom the data pertains, alone or in combination with other data.

(d) The commission, its staff, the lifeline program’s third-party administrator, and lifeline service providers, and the providers’ agents, successors, or assignees, may request, but
 may not require, applicants and subscribers to provide social security numbers, in whole or in part, to apply to, or participate in, the lifeline program.

(e) To the extent Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code applies to this article, the Legislature finds and declares that this article is a state law that may provide assistance and services for individuals not lawfully present in the United States within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immigration authority” means any federal, state, or local officer, employee, or person performing
 immigration enforcement functions.

(2) “Immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 347, Sec. 1.   (AB 1303)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

877.

Nothing in this article precludes the commission from changing any rate established pursuant to Section 873, either specifically or pursuant to any general restructuring of all telephone rates, charges, and classifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 163, Sec. 2.   Effective July 16, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

878.

(a) A lifeline telephone service subscriber shall be provided with one lifeline subscription, as defined by the commission, at the subscriber’s principal place of residence, and no other member of that subscriber’s family or household who maintains residence at that place is eligible for lifeline telephone service.

(b) An applicant for lifeline telephone service may report only one address in this state as the principal place of residence.

(c) Multiple lifeline telephone service subscribers may maintain the same address if they are not members of the same household.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Adult” means any person 18 years of age or older.

(2) “Economic unit” means all adult individuals contributing to and sharing in the income and expenses of a household.

(3) “Household” means any group of individuals, including the subscriber, who are living together at the same address and as one economic unit. A household may include related and unrelated persons. If an adult has no, or minimal, income and lives with someone who provides financial support to that adult, both persons shall be part of the same household. A child under 18 years of age and living with a parent or guardian shall be part of the same household as the parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 765, Sec. 2.   (SB 394)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

878.5.

The commission shall adopt a portability freeze rule for the lifeline program by January 15, 2017. The commission shall consider including all of the following in the rule:

(a) A 60-day duration of the portability freeze.

(b) A period of time when a subscriber would be able to terminate lifeline service without penalty, similar to that established in Section 4.13.5 of commission Decision 14-01-036 (January 16, 2014), Decision Adopting Revisions to Modernize and Expand the California Lifeline Program.

(c) A requirement that the administrator of the lifeline program provide a telephone corporation providing lifeline service with real-time information concerning
 whether a subscriber has enrolled with another telephone corporation during the period of the portability freeze adopted by the commission pursuant to this section and, if the subscriber enrolled during this period, the date of enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 244.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

878.6.
